Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-123
Simultaneous death of joint tenants.

Where there is no sufficient evidence that two joint tenants have died otherwise than simultaneously the property so held shall be distributed one-half as if one had survived and one-half as if the other had survived. If there are more than two joint tenants and all of them have so died the property thus distributed shall be in the proportion that one bears to the whole number of joint tenants.

Laws 1947, c. 112, § 3, p. 306.